District of Columbia statutes.
46-352.01

(a)

In a proceeding to establish or enforce a support order or to determine parentage of a child, a tribunal of the District may exercise personal jurisdiction over a nonresident individual or the individual’s guardian or conservator if:

(1)

The individual is personally served with notice within the District;

(2)

The individual submits to the jurisdiction of the District by consent in a record, by entering a general appearance, or by filing a responsive document having the effect of waiving any contest to personal jurisdiction;

(3)

The individual resided with the child in the District;

(4)

The individual resided in the District and provided prenatal expenses or support for the child;

(5)

The child resides in the District as a result of the acts or directives of the individual;

(6)

The individual engaged in sexual intercourse in the District and the child may have been conceived by that act of intercourse; or

(7)

There is any other basis consistent with the laws of the District and the Constitution of the United States for the exercise of personal jurisdiction.

(b)

The bases of personal jurisdiction set forth in subsection (a) of this section or in any other law of the District may not be used to acquire personal jurisdiction for a tribunal of the District to modify a child-support order of another state unless the requirements of § 46-356.11 are met, or, in the case of a foreign support order, unless the requirements of § 46-356.15 are met.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 201, 63 DCR 222

History